District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.02

Special meeting.

(a)

A membership corporation shall hold a special meeting of members:

(1)

At the call of its board of directors or the persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

(2)

If the holders of at least 10%, or such other amount up to 25% as the articles of incorporation or bylaws specify, of all the votes entitled to be cast on an issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation one or more demands in the form of a record for the meeting describing the purpose for which it is to be held.

(b)

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a demand for a special meeting may be revoked by notice to that effect received by the membership corporation from the members calling the meeting prior to the receipt by the corporation of demands sufficient in number to require the holding of a special meeting.

(c)

If not otherwise fixed under § 29-405.03 or § 29-405.07, the record date for determining members entitled to demand a special meeting shall be the date the first member signs a demand.

(d)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, special meetings of the members may be held in or outside of the District at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

(e)

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by § 29-405.05(c) may be conducted at a special meeting of the members.

(f)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that a special meeting of members does not need to be held at a geographic location if the meeting is held by means of the Internet or other electronic communications technology in a fashion pursuant to which the members have the opportunity to read or hear the proceedings substantially concurrently with their occurrence, vote on matters submitted to the members, pose questions, and make comments.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-405.03.